Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.09.070

Effect of favorable vote.

If a majority of the voters voting upon the adoption of the proposed new, altered, or revised charter favor it, it shall become the charter of the charter code city and the organic law thereof, superseding any existing charter; but if any offices are abolished or dispensed with by the new, altered, or revised charter, and any new offices created thereby, such charter shall not go into effect until the election and qualification of such new officers at the next general municipal election if one is to be held within one hundred and eighty days, or at a special election to be held for that purpose not less than ninety days, nor more than one hundred and eighty days after approval of such charter by the voters.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.09.070.]